Montana, session 2025, HB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Appropriation for Montana historic preservation grant program. (1) There is
appropriated $6,229,375 $5,918,092 from the historic preservation grant program account established in 22-3-
1307 to the department of commerce for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to finance projects authorized in
subsection (2).
(2) The following projects and applicants are authorized for grants in their order of priority:
Rank Project/Applicant Grant Amount
1 Carter County Museum
Carter County Geological Society $500,000 $300,000
2 Yaak Community Hall
Lincoln County $168,000
2 John Engen Building
Missoula Local Government Building Special District $498,800 $350,000
4 Paris Gibson Square Museum of Art
Paris Gibson Square Museum of Art $356,377
5 Lincoln School
Lincoln School Foundation $364,980 $300,000
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
6 KPRK Building
Moleo Media Group, LLC $500,000 $250,000
7 Historic Lavina School
Lavina Public Schools $398,128 $250,000
8 Cooper Village Museum and Arts Center
Cooper Village Museum and Arts Center $233,000
8 Red Lodge Pea Cannery and Brewery Building
Metagabbro LLC $500,000
8 Red Lodge Pea Cannery and Brewery Building
Metagabbro LLC $50,000
8 Yellowstone Art Museum Main Building
Yellowstone Art Museum $328,000 $210,000
11 Fountain Terrace Condominiums
Fountain Terrace Condominiums, Inc. $500,000
11 Octagonal Pavilion
Madison County $500,000 $200,000
13 St. Michael's Church
Friends of the Historical Museum at Fort Missoula $114,492
13 St. Michael's Church
Friends of the Historical Museum at Fort Missoula $114,492
13 Historic Hamilton Town Hall
Hamilton, City of $305,607 $150,000
15 Boulder Hot Springs Bathhouse
Peace Valley Partnership, LLC $500,000
16 Building 27
Northern Rockies Heritage Center $300,971
16 W.A. Clark Jr., Prison Theater at the Old Montana Prison in Deer Lodge
Powell County Museum and Arts Foundation, Inc. $161,200
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
18 Apsáalooke Center for Culture and History
Little Big Horn College $500,000 $250,000
19 Hill County Courthouse
Hill County $500,000 $350,000
20 Historic Hotel Libby
Friends of Historic Hotel Libby $500,000
20 Thompson-Hickman Memorial Building
Madison County $500,000
20 Historic Shelby High
Shelby, City of $500,000
23 Glendive Public Library
Dawson County $79,011
23 Sandstone and Cobblestone Schools Complex
Sandstone Preservation Community $500,000
23 Sandstone and Cobblestone Schools Complex
Sandstone Preservation Community $150,000
25 The Recording Center
Mathson Design, LLC $50,000 $24,600
26 State School for the Deaf and Blind "Cottage 5"/Jefferson County Health Department
Jefferson County $500,000
26 Yucca Theatre
Treasure County 89ers, Inc. $145,000
26 St. Peter's Episcopal Cathedral
St. Peter's Episcopal Cathedral of Helena $250,000
29 Anaconda-Deer Lodge County Courthouse
Anaconda-Deer Lodge County $400,000
29 Phoenix Building
National Affordable Housing Network $500,000
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
29 Anaconda Deer Lodge County Courthouse
Anaconda Deer Lodge County $200,000
31 Kalispell Community Thrift/Scandinavian Methodist Church
Community Thrift LLC $240,000 $50,000
32 Granite County Museum & Cultural Center
Granite County Museum & Cultural Center $500,000
32 Kalispell Train Depot Building
Kalispell, City of $286,337 $150,000
34 Mountain States Telephone Building
MSTB, LLC $150,000
35 Butte Steam Plant Event Center
Headwaters RC&D Area, Inc., on behalf of S Team LLC $200,000
34 Mountain States Telephone Building
MSTB, LLC $500,000
35 Miles City Convent Keepers Community Center
Miles City Convent Keepers $434,226
36 Fortin Ranch House
Blarney Ranch, LLC $500,000
36 Butte Steam Plant Event Center
Headwaters RC&D Area, Inc., on behalf of S-Team LLC $500,000
36 Livingston Elks Lodge
Livingston Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks Lodge 246 $500,000
39 Shrine Auditorium
Native American Development Corporation $500,000 $350,000
39 Maclean Icehouse
Seeley Lake Historical Society $10,000
41 Adams Hotel
Friends of the Historic Adams Hotel $200,000
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
42 Lewis & Clark County Courthouse
Lewis & Clark County $500,000 $300,000
42 St. Patrick's Mission
World Museum of Mining $173,040 $155,000
44 Anaconda Montana Hotel
Anaconda Restoration Association $51,000
44 The Montana Hotel
Anaconda Restoration Association $100,746
45 Pi Chapter Delta Gamma House
Pi House Corporation of Delta Gamma $ 240,000
46 The Montana Building
Montana Building Condominium Association (MBCA) $481,920
47 Penwell Building
Urban Renewal Associates, LLC $500,000
48 Anaconda Elks Club
Anaconda Benevolent Protective Order of Elks Lodge 239 $429,000 $250,000
49 Yellowstone Perc
Sidney Yellowstone Merc, LLC $500,000
50 Superior Schoolhouse
West Valley Property, LLC $500,000
51 Historic Libby High School/Libby Lofts
Libby Lofts, LLC $500,000
52 Historic Montgomery Ward Building
333 Skyline LLC $500,000
53 Billings Depot Caboose
Billings Depot, Inc. $236,000
53 Billings Depot Caboose
Billings Depot, Inc. $150,000
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
53 Union Pacific Dining Lodge
West Yellowstone, Town of $500,000 $300,000
55 Prairie County Museum & Evelyn Cameron Gallery
Prairie County Museum & Evelyn Cameron Gallery, Inc. $72,478 $50,000
56 Downtowner Building
Downtowner Group, LLC $273,000
57 The Red Barn at Hagerman Ranch
Basin, Inc. $228,800
58 Project 400
Golden Triangle Development, LLC $378,167
59 Villa Theatre
Villa Theatre Foundation $500,000 $100,000
60 RB Drive-In
Brooks Adventures, LLC DBA RB Drive-In $109,035
61 Lenox Flats, LLC
Homeword Inc. $188,330
61 Yellowstone Gateway Museum of Park County
Yellowstone Gateway Museum Foundation $499,620 $200,000
63 Main Street Building
Lonesome Prairie Properties, LLC $232,000
(3) Funding for the projects in subsection (2) is provided in the order of priority as long as there are
sufficient funds available from the amount that was deposited in the historic preservation grant program account
during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025. The funds in this subsection (3) must be awarded for the projects
and in amounts not to exceed the amounts set out in subsection (2) subject to the conditions set forth in
[section 3]. However, any of the projects listed in subsection (2) that do not complete the conditions described
in [section 3(1)] by September 1, 2026, must be reviewed by the next regular legislature to determine if the
authorized grant should be withdrawn.
(4) If sufficient funds are available, this section constitutes a valid obligation of funds to the grant
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
projects listed in subsection (2) for the purposes of encumbering the funds in the historic preservation grant
program account established in 22-3-1307 for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, pursuant to 17-7-302. A
grant recipient's entitlement to receive funds is dependent on the grant recipient's compliance with the
conditions described in [section 3] and on the availability of funds.
(5) The legislature, pursuant to 22-3-1305, authorizes the grants for the projects specified in
subsection (2).
(6) (a) Except as provided in subsection (6)(b), a grant recipient shall enter into a definitive, binding
contract with a qualified contractor to construct the project prior to September 30 of the even-numbered year
preceding the next regularly scheduled legislative session. If the grant recipient fails to meet the deadline, any
obligation to the grant recipient ceases, and the funds revert to the historic preservation grant program account
established in 22-3-1307 for use in the next biennium.
(b) A grant recipient who fails to meet the contract deadline for either of the following reasons may
request one 2-year extension, during which the project must be placed under contract or any obligation to the
grant ceases:
(i) the project is damaged by fire or another form of casualty; or
(ii) the grant recipient fails to find a qualified contractor to construct the project and diligently
pursued all reasonable avenues to find a qualified contractor.
(7) Grant recipients shall complete all of the conditions described in [section 3(1)] by September
30, 2026, or any obligation to the grant recipient ceases.
Section 2. Approval of grants -- completion of biennial appropriation. (1) The legislature,
pursuant to 22-3-1305, authorizes grants for the projects specified in [section 1(2)].
(2) The authorization of these grants completes a biennial appropriation from the historic
preservation grant program account established in 22-3-1307.
(3) Grants to entities from prior biennia are reauthorized for the completion of contract work.
Section 3. Condition of grants -- disbursement of funds. (1) The disbursement of grant funds for
the projects specified in [section 1(2)] is subject to the completion of the following conditions:
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
(a) The grant recipient shall document that other matching funds required for the completion of the
project are firmly committed.
(b) The grant recipient must have a project management plan that is approved by the department
of commerce.
(c) The grant recipient must be in compliance with the auditing and reporting requirements
provided for in 2-7-503 and establish a financial accounting system that the department can reasonably ensure
conforms to generally accepted accounting principles. Tribal governments shall comply with the auditing and
reporting requirements provided for in 2 CFR 200.
(d) The grant recipient shall satisfactorily comply with any conditions described in the application or
project summaries section of the Montana historic preservation grant program 2025 biennium report to the 69th
legislature.
(e) The grant recipient shall satisfy other specific requirements considered necessary by the
department of commerce to accomplish the purpose of the project as evidenced by the application to the
department.
(f) The grant recipient shall execute a grant agreement with the department of commerce.
(2) Recipients of Montana historic preservation grant program funds are subject to the
requirements of the department of commerce as described in the most recent edition of the Montana Historic
Preservation Grant Program Project Administration Manual adopted by the department through the
administrative rulemaking process.
Section 4. Supplemental appropriations. In the event that the total cost of a project exceeds the
amount of the grant and matching funds, the grant recipient is fully responsible for funding the cost overrun. A
supplemental appropriation may not be granted to complete the project.
Section 5. Other powers and duties of department of commerce. (1) The department of
commerce shall disburse grant funds on a reimbursement basis as grant recipients incur eligible project
expenses.
(2) If actual project expenses are lower than the projected expense of the project, the department
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 12
may, at its discretion, reduce the amount of grant funds provided to grant recipients in proportion to all other
project funding sources.
Section 6. Section 4(1), Chapter 710, Laws of 2023, is amended to read:
(1) The portion of section 4(1), Chapter 710, Laws of 2023, appropriating money from the historic
preservation grant program account to the department of commerce for the indicated project is amended to
read:
"15 Rocky Mountain Building
Community Health Care Center, Inc. dba Alluvion Health $400,000"
(2) The portion of section 4(1), Chapter 710, Laws of 2023, appropriating money from the historic
preservation grant program account to the department of commerce for the indicated project is amended to
read:
"20 Montana Club
Original Montana Club Cooperative Association Rathskeller, LLC $90,040"
Section 7. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 8. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 12
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 12, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 12
INTRODUCED BY J. FITZPATRICK
BY REQUEST OF THE OFFICE OF BUDGET AND PROGRAM PLANNING
AN ACT APPROPRIATING MONEY FROM THE HISTORIC PRESERVATION GRANT PROGRAM ACCOUNT
TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE FOR HISTORIC PRESERVATION PROJECTS; AUTHORIZING
GRANTS FROM THE HISTORIC PRESERVATION GRANT PROGRAM ACCOUNT; PLACING CONDITIONS
ON GRANTS AND FUNDS; AMENDING SECTION 4(1), CHAPTER 710, LAWS OF 2023; AND PROVIDING AN
EFFECTIVE DATE.”